Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-247
Conveyances; power of attorney; copies, penalty.

A duly authenticated copy of the record of any power recorded in this state shall be entitled to record and shall operate to all intents and purposes, having the same force and effect, as the record of the original instrument. Such copy shall be duly authenticated only when there shall be attached thereto a certificate of the register of deeds under his hand and official seal, setting forth that the same is a true copy of the original record in his office, the date of the filing of the original instrument, and the volume and page where the same is recorded; Provided, it shall be unlawful for any register of deeds in this state to give a certified copy of any power of attorney which has been revoked and the revocation thereof filed in his office, without also stating the fact of such revocation in his certificate; and any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1883, c. 64, § 1, p. 265;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 27, p. 373;

R.S.1913, § 6217;

C.S.1922, § 5616;

C.S.1929, § 76-222;

R.S.1943, § 76-247;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 207.